Missouri, session 2026, SB1482.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 192.2200, 192.2400, 192.2475,
192.2490, 192.2495, 192.2500, 198.006, 198.070, and 208.912,
RSMo, are repealed and twelve new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 192.2200, 192.2256, 192.2257,
192.2400, 192.2475, 192.2490, 192.2495, 192.2500, 197.550,
198.006, 198.070, and 208.912, to read as follows:
192.2200. As used in sections 192.2200 to [192.2260]
192.2275, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or
emotional injury or harm, including financial exploitation
by any person, firm, or corporation;
(2) "Adult", an individual over the age of eighteen;
(3) "Adult day care program", a group program designed
to provide care and supervision to meet the needs of
functionally impaired adults for periods of less than twenty-
four hours but more than two hours per day in a place other
than the adult's own home;
(4) "Adult day care provider", the person,
corporation, partnership, association or organization
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1482 2
legally responsible for the overall operation of the adult
day care program;
(5) "Department", the department of health and senior
services;
(6) "Financial exploitation", when a person knowingly
obtains control over the property of a participant with the
intent to deprive the participant of the use, benefit, or
possession of his or her property, thereby benefitting the
offender or detrimentally affecting the participant by means
of:
(a) Deceit;
(b) Coercion;
(c) Creating or confirming another person's impression
that is false and that the offender does not believe to be
true;
(d) Failing to correct a false impression that the
offender previously has created or confirmed;
(e) Preventing another person from acquiring
information pertinent to the disposition of the property
involved;
(f) Selling or otherwise transferring or encumbering
property, or failing to disclose a lien, adverse claim, or
other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the property,
whether such impediment is or is not valid or is or is not a
matter of official record;
(g) Promising performance that the offender does not
intend to perform or knows will not be performed. Failure
to perform on its own shall not be sufficient evidence to
prove that the offender did not intend to perform; or
(h) Undue influence, which means the use of influence
by someone who exercises authority over a participant in
order to take unfair advantage of that person's vulnerable

SB 1482 3
state of mind, neediness, pain, or agony. Undue influence
includes, but is not limited to, the improper or fraudulent
use of a power of attorney, guardianship, conservatorship,
or other fiduciary authority;
(7) "Functionally impaired adult", an adult who by
reason of age or infirmity requires care and supervision;
[(7)] (8) "License", the document issued by the
department in accordance with the provisions of sections
192.2200 to [192.2260] 192.2275 to an adult day care program
which authorizes the adult day care provider to operate the
program in accordance with the provisions of sections
192.2200 to [192.2260] 192.2275 and the applicable rules
promulgated pursuant thereto;
(9) "Neglect", the failure to provide, by those
responsible for the care, custody, and control of a
participant in an adult day care program, the services that
are reasonable and necessary to maintain the physical and
mental health of the participant, when such failure presents
either an imminent danger to the health, safety, or welfare
of the participant or a substantial probability that death
or serious physical harm would result;
[(8)] (10) "Operator", any person licensed or required
to be licensed under the provisions of sections 192.2200 to
[192.2260] 192.2275 in order to establish, conduct, or
maintain an adult day care program;
[(9)] (11) "Participant", a functionally impaired
adult who is enrolled in an adult day care program;
[(10)] (12) "Person", any individual, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, agency, or an
incorporated or unincorporated organization regardless of
the name used;

SB 1482 4
[(11)] (13) "Related", any of the following by blood,
marriage or adoption: parent, child, grandchild, brother,
sister, half-brother, half-sister, stepparent, uncle, aunt,
niece, nephew, or first cousin;
[(12)] (14) "Staff participant ratio", the number of
adult care staff required by the department in relation to
the number of adults being cared for by such staff;
[(13)] (15) "Substantial noncompliance", any violation
of a class I or class II standard or twenty or more
violations of class III standards.
192.2256. 1. When any advanced emergency medical
technician; adult day care worker; bank personnel;
chiropractor; Christian Science practitioner; coroner;
dentist; embalmer; emergency medical technician; employee of
the departments of social services, mental health, or health
and senior services; employee of a local area agency on
aging or an organized area agency on aging program;
firefighter; first responder, as defined in section
192.2405; funeral director; home health agency or home
health agency employee; hospital and clinic personnel
engaged in examination, care, or treatment of persons; in-
home services owner, provider, operator, or employee; law
enforcement officer; long-term care facility administrator
or employee; medical examiner; medical resident or intern;
mental health professional; minister; nurse; nurse
practitioner; optometrist; other health practitioner;
paramedic; peace officer; pharmacist; physical therapist;
physician; physician's assistant; podiatrist; probation or
parole officer; psychologist; social worker; or other person
with the care of a person sixty years of age or older or an
eligible adult, as defined in section 192.2400, has
reasonable cause to believe that a participant of an adult

SB 1482 5
day care program has been abused or neglected, he or she
shall immediately report or cause a report to be made to the
department.
2. The report shall contain the name and address of
the adult day care program, the name of the participant,
information regarding the nature of the abuse or neglect,
the name of the complainant, and any other information that
may be helpful in an investigation.
3. Any person required in subsection 1 of this section
to report or cause a report to be made to the department who
knowingly fails to make a report within a reasonable time
after the act of abuse or neglect as required in this
section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
4. In addition to the penalties imposed by this
section, any adult day care operator who knowingly conceals
any act of abuse or neglect resulting in death or serious
physical injury, as defined in section 556.061, is guilty of
a class E felony.
5. In addition to those persons required to report
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, any other person
having reasonable cause to believe that a participant has
been abused or neglected may report such information to the
department.
6. Upon receipt of a report, the department shall
initiate an investigation within twenty-four hours and, as
soon as possible during the course of the investigation,
shall notify the participant's next of kin or responsible
party of the report and the investigation and further notify
them whether the report was substantiated or
unsubstantiated, unless such person is the alleged
perpetrator of the abuse or neglect. As provided in section
192.2425, substantiated reports of elder abuse shall be

SB 1482 6
promptly reported by the department to the appropriate law
enforcement agency and prosecutor.
7. Reports, including investigation records, shall be
confidential, as provided under section 192.2500.
8. Anyone, except any person who has abused or
neglected a participant in an adult day care program, who
makes a report under this section or who testifies in any
administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the
report shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability
for making such a report or for testifying except for
liability for perjury, unless such person acted negligently,
recklessly, in bad faith, or with malicious purpose. It is
an offense under section 565.189 for any person to knowingly
file a false report of elder abuse or neglect.
9. Within five working days after a report required to
be made under this section is received, the person making
the report shall be notified in writing of its receipt and
of the initiation of the investigation.
10. No person who directs or exercises any authority
in an adult day care program shall evict, harass, dismiss,
or retaliate against a participant or employee because such
participant or employee or any member of such participant's
or employee's family has made a report of any violation or
suspected violation of laws, ordinances, or regulations
applying to the adult day care program that the participant,
the participant's family, or an employee has reasonable
cause to believe has been committed or has occurred.
Through the existing department information and referral
telephone contact line, participants, their families, and
employees of an adult day care program shall be able to
obtain information about their rights, protections, and

SB 1482 7
options in cases of harassment, dismissal, or retaliation
due to a report being made under this section.
11. Any person who abuses or neglects a participant of
an adult day care program is subject to criminal prosecution
under section 565.184.
12. The department shall maintain the employee
disqualification list and place on the employee
disqualification list the names of any persons who are or
have been employed in any adult day care program and who
have been finally determined by the department under section
192.2490 to have knowingly or recklessly abused or neglected
a participant. A person acts "knowingly" with respect to
the person's conduct when a reasonable person should be
aware of the result caused by his or her conduct. A person
100 acts "recklessly" when the person consciously disregards a
101 substantial and unjustifiable risk that the person's conduct
102 will result in serious physical injury and such disregard
103 constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of care that
104 a reasonable person would exercise in the situation.
105 13. The timely self-reporting of incidents to the
106 central registry by an adult day care program shall continue
107 to be investigated in accordance with department policy, and
108 shall not be counted or reported by the department as a hot-
109 line call but rather a self-reported incident. If the self-
110 reported incident results in a regulatory violation, such
111 incident shall be reported as a substantiated report.
192.2257. 1. Any person having reasonable cause to
believe that a misappropriation of a participant of an adult
day care program's property or funds has occurred shall
report such information to the department.
2. For each report the department shall attempt to
obtain the names and addresses of the adult day care

SB 1482 8
program, the employee of the adult day care program, the
participant of the adult day care program, information
regarding the nature of the misappropriation, the name of
the complainant, and any other information that may be
helpful in an investigation.
3. Any adult day care program or adult day care
program employee who puts to his or her own use or the use
of the adult day care program or otherwise diverts from the
adult day care program participant's use any personal
property or funds of the adult day care program participant
is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
4. Upon receipt of a report, the department shall
initiate an investigation and report information gained from
such investigation to appropriate law enforcement
authorities.
5. If the investigation indicates probable
misappropriation of property or funds of an adult day care
program participant, the investigator shall refer the
complaint together with the investigator's report to the
department director or the director's designee for
appropriate action.
6. Reports, including investigation records, shall be
confidential, as provided under section 192.2500.
7. Anyone, except any person participating in or
benefitting from the misappropriation of funds, who makes a
report under this section or who testifies in any
administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the
report shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability
for making such a report or for testifying except for
liability for perjury, unless such person acted negligently,
recklessly, in bad faith, or with malicious purpose.

SB 1482 9
8. Within five working days after a report required to
be made under this section is received, the person making
the report shall be notified in writing of its receipt and
of the initiation of the investigation.
9. No person who directs or exercises any authority in
an adult day care program shall harass, dismiss, or
retaliate against an adult day care program participant or
employee because he or she or any member of his or her
family has made a report of any violation or suspected
violation of laws, ordinances, or regulations applying to
the adult day care program or any adult day care program
employee that he or she has reasonable cause to believe has
been committed or has occurred.
10. The department shall maintain the employee
disqualification list and place on the employee
disqualification list the names of any persons who are or
have been employed by an adult day care program and who have
been finally determined by the department under section
192.2490 to have misappropriated any property or funds of an
adult day care program participant and who came to be known
to the person, directly or indirectly, while employed by an
adult day care program.
192.2400. As used in sections 192.2400 to 192.2505,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or
emotional injury or harm, including financial exploitation
by any person, firm, or corporation and bullying;
(2) "Bullying", intimidation or harassment that causes
a reasonable person to fear for his or her physical safety
or property and may consist of physical actions including
gestures; cyberbullying; oral, electronic, or written

SB 1482 10
communication; and any threat of retaliation for reporting
of such acts;
(3) "Court", the circuit court;
(4) "Department", the department of health and senior
services;
(5) "Director", director of the department of health
and senior services or his or her designees;
(6) "Financial exploitation", when a person knowingly
obtains control over the property of an eligible adult with
the intent to deprive the eligible adult of the use,
benefit, or possession of his or her property, thereby
benefitting the offender or detrimentally affecting the
eligible adult by:
(a) Deceit;
(b) Coercion;
(c) Creating or confirming another person's impression
that is false and that the offender does not believe to be
true;
(d) Failing to correct a false impression that the
offender previously has created or confirmed;
(e) Preventing another person from acquiring
information pertinent to the disposition of the property
involved;
(f) Selling or otherwise transferring or encumbering
property or failing to disclose a lien, adverse claim, or
other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the property,
whether such impediment is or is not valid or is or is not a
matter of official record;
(g) Promising performance that the offender does not
intend to perform or knows will not be performed. Failure
to perform on its own shall not be sufficient evidence to
prove that the offender did not intend to perform; or

SB 1482 11
(h) Undue influence, which means the use of influence
by someone who exercises authority over an eligible adult in
order to take unfair advantage of that person's vulnerable
state of mind, neediness, pain, or agony. Undue influence
includes, but is not limited to, the improper or fraudulent
use of a power of attorney, guardianship, conservatorship,
or other fiduciary authority;
(7) "Eligible adult", a person sixty years of age or
older who is unable to protect his or her own interests or
adequately perform or obtain services which are necessary to
meet his or her essential human needs or an adult with a
disability, as defined in section 192.2005, between the ages
of eighteen and fifty-nine who is unable to protect his or
her own interests or adequately perform or obtain services
which are necessary to meet his or her essential human needs;
[(7)] (8) "Home health agency", the same meaning as
such term is defined in section 197.400;
[(8)] (9) "Home health agency employee", a person
employed by a home health agency;
[(9)] (10) "Home health patient", an eligible adult
who is receiving services through any home health agency;
[(10)] (11) "In-home services client", an eligible
adult who is receiving services in his or her private
residence through any in-home services provider agency;
[(11)] (12) "In-home services employee", a person
employed by an in-home services provider agency;
[(12)] (13) "In-home services provider agency", a
business entity under contract with the department or with a
Medicaid participation agreement, which employs persons to
deliver any kind of services provided for eligible adults in
their private homes;

SB 1482 12
[(13)] (14) "Least restrictive environment", a
physical setting where protective services for the eligible
adult and accommodation is provided in a manner no more
restrictive of an individual's personal liberty and no more
intrusive than necessary to achieve care and treatment
objectives;
[(14)] (15) "Likelihood of serious physical harm", one
or more of the following:
(a) A substantial risk that physical harm to an
eligible adult will occur because of his or her failure or
inability to provide for his or her essential human needs as
evidenced by acts or behavior which has caused such harm or
which gives another person probable cause to believe that
the eligible adult will sustain such harm;
(b) A substantial risk that physical harm will be
inflicted by an eligible adult upon himself or herself, as
evidenced by recent credible threats, acts, or behavior
which has caused such harm or which places another person in
reasonable fear that the eligible adult will sustain such
harm;
(c) A substantial risk that physical harm will be
inflicted by another upon an eligible adult as evidenced by
recent acts or behavior which has caused such harm or which
gives another person probable cause to believe the eligible
adult will sustain such harm;
(d) A substantial risk that further physical harm will
occur to an eligible adult who has suffered physical injury,
100 neglect, sexual or emotional abuse, or other maltreatment or
101 wasting of his or her financial resources by another person;
102 [(15)] (16) "Neglect", the failure to provide services
103 to an eligible adult by any person, firm or corporation with
104 a legal or contractual duty to do so, when such failure

SB 1482 13
105 presents either an imminent danger to the health, safety, or
106 welfare of the client or a substantial probability that
107 death or serious physical harm would result;
108 [(16)] (17) "Protective services", services provided
109 by the state or other governmental or private organizations
110 or individuals which are necessary for the eligible adult to
111 meet his or her essential human needs.
192.2475. 1. When any advanced emergency medical
technician; adult day care worker; bank personnel;
chiropractor; Christian Science practitioner; coroner;
dentist; embalmer; emergency medical technician; employee of
the departments of social services, mental health, or health
and senior services; employee of a local area agency on
aging or an organized area agency on aging program;
firefighter; first responder, as defined in section
192.2405; funeral director; home health agency or home
health agency employee; hospital and clinic personnel
engaged in examination, care, or treatment of persons; in-
home services owner, provider, operator, or employee; law
enforcement officer; long-term care facility administrator
or employee; medical examiner; medical resident or intern;
mental health professional; minister; nurse; nurse
practitioner; paramedic; optometrist; other health
practitioner; peace officer; pharmacist; physical therapist;
physician; physician's assistant; podiatrist; probation or
parole officer; psychologist; or social worker has
reasonable cause to believe that an in-home services client
has been abused or neglected, as a result of in-home
services, he or she shall immediately report or cause a
report to be made to the department. If the report is made
by a physician of the in-home services client, the

SB 1482 14
department shall maintain contact with the physician
regarding the progress of the investigation.
2. Any person required in subsection 1 of this section
to report or cause a report to be made to the department who
fails to do so within a reasonable time after the act of
abuse or neglect is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
3. The report shall contain the names and addresses of
the in-home services provider agency, the in-home services
employee, the in-home services client, the home health
agency, the home health agency employee, information
regarding the nature of the abuse or neglect, the name of
the complainant, and any other information which might be
helpful in an investigation.
4. In addition to those persons required to report
under subsection 1 of this section, any other person having
reasonable cause to believe that an in-home services client
or home health patient has been abused or neglected by an in-
home services employee or home health agency employee may
report such information to the department.
5. If the investigation indicates possible abuse or
neglect of an in-home services client or home health
patient, the investigator shall refer the complaint together
with his or her report to the department director or his or
her designee for appropriate action. If, during the
investigation or at its completion, the department has
reasonable cause to believe that immediate action is
necessary to protect the in-home services client or home
health patient from abuse or neglect, the department or the
local prosecuting attorney may, or the attorney general upon
request of the department shall, file a petition for
temporary care and protection of the in-home services client
or home health patient in a circuit court of competent

SB 1482 15
jurisdiction. The circuit court in which the petition is
filed shall have equitable jurisdiction to issue an ex parte
order granting the department authority for the temporary
care and protection of the in-home services client or home
health patient, for a period not to exceed thirty days.
6. Reports, including investigation records, shall be
confidential, as provided under section 192.2500.
7. Anyone, except any person who has abused or
neglected an in-home services client or home health patient,
who makes a report pursuant to this section or who testifies
in any administrative or judicial proceeding arising from
the report shall be immune from any civil or criminal
liability for making such a report or for testifying except
for liability for perjury, unless such person acted
negligently, recklessly, in bad faith, or with malicious
purpose.
8. Within five working days after a report required to
be made under this section is received, the person making
the report shall be notified in writing of its receipt and
of the initiation of the investigation.
9. No person who directs or exercises any authority in
an in-home services provider agency or home health agency
shall harass, dismiss or retaliate against an in-home
services client or home health patient, or an in-home
services employee or a home health agency employee because
he or she or any member of his or her family has made a
report of any violation or suspected violation of laws,
standards or regulations applying to the in-home services
provider agency or home health agency or any in-home
services employee or home health agency employee which he or
she has reasonable cause to believe has been committed or
has occurred.

SB 1482 16
10. Any person who abuses or neglects an in-home
services client or home health patient is subject to
criminal prosecution under section 565.184. If such person
is an in-home services employee and has been found guilty by
a court, and if the supervising in-home services provider
willfully and knowingly failed to report known abuse by such
employee to the department, the supervising in-home services
provider may be subject to administrative penalties of one
thousand dollars per violation to be collected by the
department and the money received therefor shall be paid to
the director of revenue and deposited in the state treasury
100 to the credit of the general revenue fund. Any in-home
101 services provider which has had administrative penalties
102 imposed by the department or which has had its contract
103 terminated may seek an administrative review of the
104 department's action pursuant to chapter 621. Any decision
105 of the administrative hearing commission may be appealed to
106 the circuit court in the county where the violation occurred
107 for a trial de novo. For purposes of this subsection, the
108 term "violation" means a determination of guilt by a court.
109 11. The department shall establish a quality assurance
110 and supervision process for clients that requires an in-home
111 services provider agency to conduct random visits to verify
112 compliance with program standards and verify the accuracy of
113 records kept by an in-home services employee.
114 12. The department shall maintain the employee
115 disqualification list and place on the employee
116 disqualification list the names of any persons who have been
117 finally determined by the department, pursuant to section
118 192.2490, to have recklessly, knowingly or purposely abused
119 or neglected an in-home services client or home health
120 patient while employed by an in-home services provider

SB 1482 17
121 agency or home health agency. For purposes of this section
122 only, "knowingly" and "recklessly" shall have the meanings
123 that are ascribed to them in this section. A person acts
124 "knowingly" with respect to the person's conduct when a
125 reasonable person should be aware of the result caused by
126 his or her conduct. A person acts "recklessly" when the
127 person consciously disregards a substantial and
128 unjustifiable risk that the person's conduct will result in
129 serious physical injury and such disregard constitutes a
130 gross deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable
131 person would exercise in the situation.
132 13. At the time a client has been assessed to
133 determine the level of care as required by rule and is
134 eligible for in-home services, the department shall conduct
135 a safe at home evaluation to determine the client's
136 physical, mental, and environmental capacity. The
137 department shall develop the safe at home evaluation tool by
138 rule in accordance with chapter 536. The purpose of the
139 safe at home evaluation is to assure that each client has
140 the appropriate level of services and professionals involved
141 in the client's care. The plan of service or care for each
142 in-home services client shall be authorized by a nurse. The
143 department may authorize the licensed in-home services
144 nurse, in lieu of the department nurse, to conduct the
145 assessment of the client's condition and to establish a plan
146 of services or care. The department may use the expertise,
147 services, or programs of other departments and agencies on a
148 case-by-case basis to establish the plan of service or
149 care. The department may, as indicated by the safe at home
150 evaluation, refer any client to a mental health
151 professional, as defined in 9 CSR 30- 4.030, for evaluation
152 and treatment as necessary.

SB 1482 18
153 14. Authorized nurse visits shall occur at least twice
154 annually to assess the client and the client's plan of
155 services. The provider nurse shall report the results of
156 his or her visits to the client's case manager. If the
157 provider nurse believes that the plan of service requires
158 alteration, the department shall be notified and the
159 department shall make a client evaluation. All authorized
160 nurse visits shall be reimbursed to the in-home services
161 provider. All authorized nurse visits shall be reimbursed
162 outside of the nursing home cap for in-home services clients
163 whose services have reached one hundred percent of the
164 average statewide charge for care and treatment in an
165 intermediate care facility, provided that the services have
166 been preauthorized by the department.
167 15. All in-home services clients shall be advised of
168 their rights by the department or the department's designee
169 at the initial evaluation. The rights shall include, but
170 not be limited to, the right to call the department for any
171 reason, including dissatisfaction with the provider or
172 services. The department may contract for services relating
173 to receiving such complaints. The department shall
174 establish a process to receive such nonabuse and neglect
175 calls other than the elder abuse and neglect hotline.
176 16. Subject to appropriations, all nurse visits
177 authorized in sections 192.2400 to 192.2475 shall be
178 reimbursed to the in-home services provider agency.
192.2490. 1. After an investigation and a
determination has been made to place a person's name on the
employee disqualification list, that person shall be
notified in writing mailed to his or her last known address
that:

SB 1482 19
(1) An allegation has been made against the person,
the substance of the allegation and that an investigation
has been conducted which tends to substantiate the
allegation;
(2) The person's name will be included in the employee
disqualification list of the department;
(3) The consequences of being so listed including the
length of time to be listed; and
(4) The person's rights and the procedure to challenge
the allegation.
2. If no reply has been received within thirty days of
mailing the notice, the department may include the name of
such person on its list. The length of time the person's
name shall appear on the employee disqualification list
shall be determined by the director or the director's
designee, based upon the criteria contained in subsection 9
of this section.
3. If the person so notified wishes to challenge the
allegation, such person may file an application for a
hearing with the department. The department shall grant the
application within thirty days after receipt by the
department and set the matter for hearing, or the department
shall notify the applicant that, after review, the
allegation has been held to be unfounded and the applicant's
name will not be listed.
4. If a person's name is included on the employee
disqualification list without the department providing
notice as required under subsection 1 of this section, such
person may file a request with the department for removal of
the name or for a hearing. Within thirty days after receipt
of the request, the department shall either remove the name
from the list or grant a hearing and set a date therefor.

SB 1482 20
5. [Any hearing shall] The director of the department
or the director's designee shall conduct any hearing by
telephone or electronic means, unless the person submits a
written request for the hearing to be conducted in the
county of the person's residence [by the director of the
department or the director's designee]. The provisions of
chapter 536 for a contested case except those provisions or
amendments which are in conflict with this section shall
apply to and govern the proceedings contained in this
section and the rights and duties of the parties involved.
The person appealing such an action shall be entitled to
present evidence, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536,
relevant to the allegations.
6. Upon the record made at the hearing, the director
of the department or the director's designee shall determine
all questions presented and shall determine whether the
person shall be listed on the employee disqualification
list. The director of the department or the director's
designee shall clearly state the reasons for his or her
decision and shall include a statement of findings of fact
and conclusions of law pertinent to the questions in issue.
7. A person aggrieved by the decision following the
hearing shall be informed of his or her right to seek
judicial review as provided under chapter 536. If the
person fails to appeal the director's findings, those
findings shall constitute a final determination that the
person shall be placed on the employee disqualification list.
8. A decision by the director shall be inadmissible in
any civil action brought against a facility or the in-home
services provider agency and arising out of the facts and
circumstances which brought about the employment
disqualification proceeding, unless the civil action is

SB 1482 21
brought against the facility or the in-home services
provider agency by the department of health and senior
services or one of its divisions.
9. The length of time the person's name shall appear
on the employee disqualification list shall be determined by
the director of the department of health and senior services
or the director's designee, based upon the following:
(1) Whether the person acted recklessly or knowingly,
as defined in chapter 562;
(2) The degree of the physical, sexual, or emotional
injury or harm; or the degree of the imminent danger to the
health, safety or welfare of a resident or in-home services
client;
(3) The degree of misappropriation of the property or
funds, or falsification of any documents for service
delivery of an in-home services client;
(4) Whether the person has previously been listed on
the employee disqualification list;
(5) Any mitigating circumstances;
(6) Any aggravating circumstances; and
(7) Whether alternative sanctions resulting in
conditions of continued employment are appropriate in lieu
of placing a person's name on the employee disqualification
list. Such conditions of employment may include, but are
not limited to, additional training and employee
counseling. Conditional employment shall terminate upon the
expiration of the designated length of time and the person's
submitting documentation which fulfills the department of
health and senior services' requirements.
10. The removal of any person's name from the list
100 under this section shall not prevent the director from

SB 1482 22
101 keeping records of all acts finally determined to have
102 occurred under this section.
103 11. The department shall provide the list maintained
104 pursuant to this section to other state departments upon
105 request and to any person, corporation, organization, or
106 association who:
107 (1) Is licensed as an operator under chapter 198;
108 (2) Provides in-home services under contract with the
109 department of social services or its divisions;
110 (3) Employs health care providers as defined in
111 section 376.1350 for temporary or intermittent placement in
112 health care facilities;
113 (4) Is approved by the department to issue
114 certificates for nursing assistants training;
115 (5) Is an entity licensed under chapter 197;
116 (6) Is a recognized school of nursing, medicine, or
117 other health profession for the purpose of determining
118 whether students scheduled to participate in clinical
119 rotations with entities described in subdivision (1), (2),
120 or (5) of this subsection are included in the employee
121 disqualification list; or
122 (7) Is a consumer reporting agency regulated by the
123 federal Fair Credit Reporting Act that conducts employee
124 background checks on behalf of entities listed in this
125 subsection. Such a consumer reporting agency shall conduct
126 the employee disqualification list check only upon the
127 initiative or request of an entity described in this
128 subsection when the entity is fulfilling its duties required
129 under this section.
130 The information shall be disclosed only to the requesting
131 entity. The department shall inform any person listed above

SB 1482 23
132 who inquires of the department whether or not a particular
133 name is on the list. The department may require that the
134 request be made in writing or by electronic means. No
135 person, corporation, organization, or association who is
136 entitled to access the employee disqualification list may
137 disclose the information to any person, corporation,
138 organization, or association who is not entitled to access
139 the list. Any person, corporation, organization, or
140 association who is entitled to access the employee
141 disqualification list who discloses the information to any
142 person, corporation, organization, or association who is not
143 entitled to access the list shall be guilty of an infraction.
144 12. No person, corporation, organization, or
145 association who received the employee disqualification list
146 under subdivisions (1) to (7) of subsection 11 of this
147 section shall knowingly employ any person who is on the
148 employee disqualification list. Any person, corporation,
149 organization, or association who received the employee
150 disqualification list under subdivisions (1) to (7) of
151 subsection 11 of this section, or any person responsible for
152 providing health care service, who declines to employ or
153 terminates a person whose name is listed in this section
154 shall be immune from suit by that person or anyone else
155 acting for or in behalf of that person for the failure to
156 employ or for the termination of the person whose name is
157 listed on the employee disqualification list.
158 13. Any employer or vendor as defined or described in
159 sections 197.250, 197.400, 198.006, 208.900, or 192.2400
160 required to deny employment to an applicant or to discharge
161 an employee, provisional or otherwise, as a result of
162 information obtained through any portion of the background
163 screening and employment eligibility determination process

SB 1482 24
164 under section 210.903, or subsequent, periodic screenings,
165 shall not be liable in any action brought by the applicant
166 or employee relating to discharge where the employer is
167 required by law to terminate the employee, provisional or
168 otherwise, and shall not be charged for unemployment
169 insurance benefits based on wages paid to the employee for
170 work prior to the date of discharge, pursuant to section
171 288.100, if the employer terminated the employee because the
172 employee:
173 (1) Has been found guilty, pled guilty or nolo
174 contendere in this state or any other state of a crime as
175 listed in subsection 6 of section 192.2495;
176 (2) Was placed on the employee disqualification list
177 under this section after the date of hire;
178 (3) Was placed on the employee disqualification
179 registry maintained by the department of mental health after
180 the date of hire;
181 (4) Has a disqualifying finding under this section,
182 section 192.2495, or is on any of the background check lists
183 in the family care safety registry under sections 210.900 to
184 210.936; or
185 (5) Was denied a good cause waiver as provided for in
186 subsection 10 of section 192.2495.
187 14. Any person who has been listed on the employee
188 disqualification list may request that the director of the
189 department or the director's designee remove his or her name
190 from the employee disqualification list. The request shall
191 be written and may not be made more than once every twelve
192 months. The request will be granted by the director of the
193 department or the director's designee upon a clear showing,
194 by written submission only, that the person will not commit
195 additional acts of abuse, neglect, misappropriation of the

SB 1482 25
196 property or funds, or the falsification of any documents of
197 service delivery to an in-home services client. The
198 director of the department or the director's designee may
199 make conditional the removal of a person's name from the
200 list on any terms that the director of the department or the
201 director's designee deems appropriate, and failure to comply
202 with such terms may result in the person's name being
203 relisted. The [director's] determination of whether to
204 remove the person's name from the list is not subject to
205 appeal.
192.2495. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
term "provider" means any person, corporation or association
who:
(1) Is licensed as an operator pursuant to chapter 198;
(2) Provides in-home services under contract with the
department of social services or its divisions;
(3) Employs health care providers as defined in
section 376.1350 for temporary or intermittent placement in
health care facilities;
(4) Is an entity licensed pursuant to chapter 197;
(5) Is a public or private facility, day program,
residential facility or specialized service operated, funded
or licensed by the department of mental health; or
(6) Is a licensed adult day care provider.
2. For the purpose of this section "patient or
resident" has the same meaning as such term is defined in
section 43.539.
3. Prior to allowing any person who has been hired as
a full-time, part-time or temporary position to have contact
with any patient or resident the provider shall, or in the
case of temporary employees hired through or contracted for

SB 1482 26
an employment agency, the employment agency shall prior to
sending a temporary employee to a provider:
(1) Request a criminal background check as provided in
section 43.540. Completion of an inquiry to the highway
patrol for criminal records that are available for
disclosure to a provider for the purpose of conducting an
employee criminal records background check shall be deemed
to fulfill the provider's duty to conduct employee criminal
background checks pursuant to this section; except that,
completing the inquiries pursuant to this subsection shall
not be construed to exempt a provider from further inquiry
pursuant to common law requirements governing due
diligence. If an applicant has not resided in this state
for five consecutive years prior to the date of his or her
application for employment, the provider shall request a
nationwide check for the purpose of determining if the
applicant has a prior criminal history in other states. The
fingerprint cards and any required fees shall be sent to the
highway patrol's central repository. The fingerprints shall
be used for searching the state repository of criminal
history information. If no identification is made,
fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for the searching of the federal criminal
history files. The patrol shall notify the submitting state
agency of any criminal history information or lack of
criminal history information discovered on the individual.
The provisions relating to applicants for employment who
have not resided in this state for five consecutive years
shall apply only to persons who have no employment history
with a licensed Missouri facility during that five-year
period. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.120,
all records related to any criminal history information

SB 1482 27
discovered shall be accessible and available to the provider
making the record request; and
(2) Make an inquiry to the department of health and
senior services whether the person is listed on the employee
disqualification list as provided in section 192.2490.
4. When the provider requests a criminal background
check pursuant to section 43.540, the requesting entity may
require that the applicant reimburse the provider for the
cost of such record check. When a provider requests a
nationwide criminal background check pursuant to subdivision
(1) of subsection 3 of this section, the total cost to the
provider of any background check required pursuant to this
section shall not exceed five dollars which shall be paid to
the state. State funding and the obligation of a provider
to obtain a nationwide criminal background check shall be
subject to the availability of appropriations.
5. An applicant for a position to have contact with
patients or residents of a provider shall:
(1) Sign a consent form as required by section 43.540
so the provider may request a criminal records review;
(2) Disclose the applicant's criminal history. For
the purposes of this subdivision "criminal history" includes
any conviction or a plea of guilty to a misdemeanor or
felony charge and shall include any suspended imposition of
sentence, any suspended execution of sentence or any period
of probation or parole;
(3) Disclose if the applicant is listed on the
employee disqualification list as provided in section
192.2490; and
(4) Disclose if the applicant is listed on any of the
background checks in the family care safety registry
established under section 210.903. A provider not otherwise

SB 1482 28
prohibited from employing an individual listed on such
background checks may deny employment to an individual
listed on any of the background checks in such registry.
6. An applicant who knowingly fails to disclose his or
her criminal history as required in subsection 5 of this
section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. A provider is
guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the provider knowingly
hires or retains a person to have contact with patients or
residents and the person has been found guilty in this state
or any other state or has been found guilty of a crime,
which if committed in Missouri would be a class A or B
felony violation of chapter 565, 566 or [569] 579, or any
violation of subsection 3 of section 198.070 or sections
565.184, 566.115, 566.116, or [section] 568.020.
100 7. Any in-home services provider agency or home health
101 agency shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor if such
102 agency knowingly employs a person to provide in-home
103 services or home health services to any in-home services
104 client or home health patient and such person either refuses
105 to register with the family care safety registry or if such
106 person:
107 (1) Has any of the disqualifying factors listed in
108 subsection 6 of this section;
109 (2) Has been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo
110 contendere to any felony offense under chapter 195 or 579;
111 (3) Has been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo
112 contendere to any felony offense under section 568.045,
113 568.050, 568.060, 568.175, 570.023, 570.025, 570.030,
114 570.040 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, 570.090,
115 570.145, 570.223, 575.230, or 576.080;
116 (4) Has been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo
117 contendere to a violation of section 577.010 or 577.012 and

SB 1482 29
118 who is alleged and found by the court to be an aggravated or
119 chronic offender under section 577.023;
120 (5) Has been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo
121 contendere to any offense requiring registration under
122 section [589.400] 589.414;
123 (6) Is listed on the department of health and senior
124 services employee disqualification list under section
125 192.2490;
126 (7) Is listed on the department of mental health
127 employee disqualification registry under section 630.170; or
128 (8) Has a finding on the child abuse and neglect
129 registry under sections 210.109 to 210.183.
130 8. The highway patrol shall examine whether protocols
131 can be developed to allow a provider to request a statewide
132 fingerprint criminal records review check through local law
133 enforcement agencies.
134 9. A provider may use a private investigatory agency
135 rather than the highway patrol to do a criminal history
136 records review check, and alternatively, the applicant pays
137 the private investigatory agency such fees as the provider
138 and such agency shall agree.
139 10. Except for the hiring restriction based on the
140 department of health and senior services employee
141 disqualification list established pursuant to section
142 192.2490, the department of health and senior services shall
143 promulgate rules and regulations to waive the hiring
144 restrictions pursuant to this section for good cause. For
145 purposes of this section, "good cause" means the department
146 has made a determination by examining the employee's prior
147 work history and other relevant factors that such employee
148 does not present a risk to the health or safety of residents.

SB 1482 30
192.2500. 1. Reports, including investigation
records, confidential under [section] sections 192.2256,
192.2257, 192.2475 to 192.2490, 197.550, 198.070, 198.090,
208.912, 208.915, and [sections 192.2475 to 192.2490] any
other record or report related to the inclusion of an
individual on the employee disqualification list shall not
be deemed a public record and shall not be subject to the
provisions of section 109.180 or chapter 610. The name of
the complainant or any person mentioned in the reports shall
not be disclosed unless:
(1) The complainant, resident, participant, patient,
or the in-home services client mentioned agrees to
disclosure of his or her name;
(2) The department determines that disclosure is
necessary in order to prevent further abuse, neglect,
misappropriation of property or funds, or falsification of
any documents verifying service delivery to an in-home
services client;
(3) Release of a name is required for conformance with
a lawful subpoena;
(4) Release of a name is required in connection with a
review by the administrative hearing commission in
accordance with section 198.039;
(5) The department determines that release of a name
is appropriate when forwarding a report of findings of an
investigation to a licensing authority; or
(6) Release of a name is requested for the purpose of
licensure under chapter 210.
2. The department shall, upon request, provide to the
division of employment security within the department of
labor and industrial relations copies of the investigative

SB 1482 31
reports that led to an employee being placed on the
disqualification list.
197.550. 1. Any person having reasonable cause to
believe that a misappropriation of a patient's property or
funds has occurred shall report such information to the
department.
2. For each report the department shall attempt to
obtain the names and addresses of the facility or provider,
the employee of the facility or provider, the patient of the
facility or provider, information regarding the nature of
the misappropriation, the name of the complainant, and any
other information that may be helpful in an investigation.
3. Any facility or provider licensed under this
chapter or facility employee who puts to his or her own use
or the use of the facility or provider or otherwise diverts
from the patient's use any personal property or funds of the
patient is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
4. Upon receipt of a report, the department shall
initiate an investigation and report information gained from
such investigation to appropriate law enforcement
authorities.
5. If the investigation indicates probable
misappropriation of property or funds of a patient, the
investigator shall refer the complaint together with the
investigator's report to the department director or the
director's designee for appropriate action.
6. Reports, including investigation records, shall be
confidential, as provided under section 192.2500.
7. Anyone, except any person participating in or
benefitting from the misappropriation of funds, who makes a
report under this section or who testifies in any
administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the

SB 1482 32
report shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability
for making such a report or for testifying except for
liability for perjury, unless such person acted negligently,
recklessly, in bad faith, or with malicious purpose.
8. Within five working days after a report required to
be made under this section is received, the person making
the report shall be notified in writing of its receipt and
of the initiation of the investigation.
9. No person who directs or exercises any authority in
a facility or provider licensed under this chapter shall
harass, dismiss, or retaliate against a patient or employee
because he or she or any member of his or her family has
made a report of any violation or suspected violation of
laws, ordinances, or regulations applying to the facility,
provider, or any employee which he or she has reasonable
cause to believe has been committed or has occurred.
10. The department shall maintain the employee
disqualification list and place on the employee
disqualification list the names of any persons who are or
have been employed by a facility or provider licensed under
this chapter and who have been finally determined by the
department under section 192.2490 to have misappropriated
any property or funds of a patient and who came to be known
to the person, directly, or indirectly, while employed by
the facility or provider.
198.006. As used in sections 198.003 to 198.186,
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or
emotional injury or harm, including financial exploitation
by any person, firm, or corporation;

SB 1482 33
(2) "Activities of daily living" or "ADL", one or more
of the following activities of daily living:
(a) Eating;
(b) Dressing;
(c) Bathing;
(d) Toileting;
(e) Transferring; and
(f) Walking;
(3) "Administrator", the person who is in general
administrative charge of a facility;
(4) "Affiliate":
(a) With respect to a partnership, each partner
thereof;
(b) With respect to a limited partnership, the general
partner and each limited partner with an interest of five
percent or more in the limited partnership;
(c) With respect to a corporation, each person who
owns, holds or has the power to vote five percent or more of
any class of securities issued by the corporation, and each
officer and director;
(d) With respect to a natural person, any parent,
child, sibling, or spouse of that person;
(5) "Appropriately trained and qualified individual",
an individual who is licensed or registered with the state
of Missouri in a health care-related field or an individual
with a degree in a health care-related field or an
individual with a degree in a health care, social services,
or human services field or an individual licensed under
chapter 344 and who has received facility orientation
training under 19 CSR 30-86.047, and dementia training under
section 192.2000 and twenty-four hours of additional
training, approved by the department, consisting of

SB 1482 34
definition and assessment of activities of daily living,
assessment of cognitive ability, service planning, and
interview skills;
(6) "Assisted living facility", any premises, other
than a residential care facility, intermediate care
facility, or skilled nursing facility, that is utilized by
its owner, operator, or manager to provide twenty-four-hour
care and services and protective oversight to three or more
residents who are provided with shelter, board, and who may
need and are provided with the following:
(a) Assistance with any activities of daily living and
any instrumental activities of daily living;
(b) Storage, distribution, or administration of
medications; and
(c) Supervision of health care under the direction of
a licensed physician, provided that such services are
consistent with a social model of care;
Such term shall not include a facility where all of the
residents are related within the fourth degree of
consanguinity or affinity to the owner, operator, or manager
of the facility;
(7) "Community-based assessment", documented basic
information and analysis provided by appropriately trained
and qualified individuals describing an individual's
abilities and needs in activities of daily living,
instrumental activities of daily living, vision/hearing,
nutrition, social participation and support, and cognitive
functioning using an assessment tool approved by the
department of health and senior services that is designed
for community-based services and that is not the nursing
home minimum data set;

SB 1482 35
(8) "Dementia", a general term for the loss of
thinking, remembering, and reasoning so severe that it
interferes with an individual's daily functioning, and may
cause symptoms that include changes in personality, mood,
and behavior;
(9) "Department", the Missouri department of health
and senior services;
(10) "Emergency", a situation, physical condition or
one or more practices, methods or operations which presents
imminent danger of death or serious physical or mental harm
to residents of a facility;
(11) "Facility", any residential care facility,
assisted living facility, intermediate care facility, or
skilled nursing facility;
(12) "Financial exploitation", when a person knowingly
obtains control over the property of a resident with the
intent to deprive the resident of the use, benefit, or
possession of his or her property, thereby benefitting the
offender or detrimentally affecting the resident by:
(a) Deceit;
(b) Coercion;
(c) Creating or confirming another person's impression
that is false and that the offender does not believe to be
true;
(d) Failing to correct a false impression that the
offender previously has created or confirmed;
(e) Preventing another person from acquiring
information pertinent to the disposition of the property
involved;
(f) Selling or otherwise transferring or encumbering
100 property, or failing to disclose a lien, adverse claim, or
101 other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the property,

SB 1482 36
102 whether such impediment is or is not valid or is or is not a
103 matter of official record;
104 (g) Promising performance that the offender does not
105 intend to perform or knows will not be performed. Failure
106 to perform on its own shall not be sufficient evidence to
107 prove that the offender did not intend to perform; or
108 (h) Undue influence, which means the use of influence
109 by someone who exercises authority over a resident in order
110 to take unfair advantage of that person's vulnerable state
111 of mind, neediness, pain, or agony. Undue influence
112 includes, but is not limited to, the improper or fraudulent
113 use of a power of attorney, guardianship, conservatorship,
114 or other fiduciary authority;
115 (13) "Health care provider", any person providing
116 health care services or goods to residents and who receives
117 funds in payment for such goods or services under Medicaid;
118 [(13)] (14) "Instrumental activities of daily living",
119 or "IADL", one or more of the following activities:
120 (a) Preparing meals;
121 (b) Shopping for personal items;
122 (c) Medication management;
123 (d) Managing money;
124 (e) Using the telephone;
125 (f) Housework; and
126 (g) Transportation ability;
127 [(14)] (15) "Intermediate care facility", any
128 premises, other than a residential care facility, assisted
129 living facility, or skilled nursing facility, which is
130 utilized by its owner, operator, or manager to provide
131 twenty-four-hour accommodation, board, personal care, and
132 basic health and nursing care services under the daily
133 supervision of a licensed nurse and under the direction of a

SB 1482 37
134 licensed physician to three or more residents dependent for
135 care and supervision and who are not related within the
136 fourth degree of consanguinity or affinity to the owner,
137 operator or manager of the facility;
138 [(15)] (16) "Manager", any person other than the
139 administrator of a facility who contracts or otherwise
140 agrees with an owner or operator to supervise the general
141 operation of a facility, providing such services as hiring
142 and training personnel, purchasing supplies, keeping
143 financial records, and making reports;
144 [(16)] (17) "Medicaid", medical assistance under
145 section 208.151, et seq., in compliance with Title XIX,
146 Public Law 89-97, 1965 amendments to the Social Security Act
147 (42 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.), as amended;
148 [(17)] (18) "Neglect", the failure to provide, by
149 those responsible for the care, custody, and control of a
150 resident in a facility, the services which are reasonable
151 and necessary to maintain the physical and mental health of
152 the resident, when such failure presents either an imminent
153 danger to the health, safety or welfare of the resident or a
154 substantial probability that death or serious physical harm
155 would result;
156 [(18)] (19) "Operator", any person licensed or
157 required to be licensed under the provisions of sections
158 198.003 to 198.096 in order to establish, conduct or
159 maintain a facility;
160 [(19)] (20) "Owner", any person who owns an interest
161 of five percent or more in:
162 (a) The land on which any facility is located;
163 (b) The structure or structures in which any facility
164 is located;

SB 1482 38
165 (c) Any mortgage, contract for deed, or other
166 obligation secured in whole or in part by the land or
167 structure in or on which a facility is located; or
168 (d) Any lease or sublease of the land or structure in
169 or on which a facility is located.
170 Owner does not include a holder of a debenture or bond
171 purchased at public issue nor does it include any regulated
172 lender unless the entity or person directly or through a
173 subsidiary operates a facility;
174 [(20)] (21) "Protective oversight", an awareness
175 twenty-four hours a day of the location of a resident, the
176 ability to intervene on behalf of the resident, the
177 supervision of nutrition, medication, or actual provisions
178 of care, and the responsibility for the welfare of the
179 resident, except where the resident is on voluntary leave;
180 [(21)] (22) "Resident", a person who by reason of
181 aging, illness, disease, or physical or mental infirmity
182 receives or requires care and services furnished by a
183 facility and who resides or boards in or is otherwise kept,
184 cared for, treated or accommodated in such facility for a
185 period exceeding twenty-four consecutive hours;
186 [(22)] (23) "Residential care facility", any premises,
187 other than an assisted living facility, intermediate care
188 facility, or skilled nursing facility, which is utilized by
189 its owner, operator or manager to provide twenty-four-hour
190 care to three or more residents, who are not related within
191 the fourth degree of consanguinity or affinity to the owner,
192 operator, or manager of the facility and who need or are
193 provided with shelter, board, and with protective oversight,
194 which may include storage and distribution or administration
195 of medications and care during short-term illness or

SB 1482 39
196 recuperation, except that, for purposes of receiving
197 supplemental welfare assistance payments under section
198 208.030, only any residential care facility licensed as a
199 residential care facility II immediately prior to August 28,
200 2006, and that continues to meet such licensure requirements
201 for a residential care facility II licensed immediately
202 prior to August 28, 2006, shall continue to receive after
203 August 28, 2006, the payment amount allocated immediately
204 prior to August 28, 2006, for a residential care facility II
205 under section 208.030;
206 [(23)] (24) "Skilled nursing facility", any premises,
207 other than a residential care facility, an assisted living
208 facility, or an intermediate care facility, which is
209 utilized by its owner, operator or manager to provide for
210 twenty-four-hour accommodation, board and skilled nursing
211 care and treatment services to at least three residents who
212 are not related within the fourth degree of consanguinity or
213 affinity to the owner, operator or manager of the facility.
214 Skilled nursing care and treatment services are those
215 services commonly performed by or under the supervision of a
216 registered professional nurse for individuals requiring
217 twenty-four-hours-a-day care by licensed nursing personnel
218 including acts of observation, care and counsel of the aged,
219 ill, injured or infirm, the administration of medications
220 and treatments as prescribed by a licensed physician or
221 dentist, and other nursing functions requiring substantial
222 specialized judgment and skill;
223 [(24)] (25) "Social model of care", long-term care
224 services based on the abilities, desires, and functional
225 needs of the individual delivered in a setting that is more
226 home-like than institutional and promotes the dignity,
227 individuality, privacy, independence, and autonomy of the

SB 1482 40
228 individual. Any facility licensed as a residential care
229 facility II prior to August 28, 2006, shall qualify as being
230 more home-like than institutional with respect to
231 construction and physical plant standards;
232 [(25)] (26) "Vendor", any person selling goods or
233 services to a health care provider;
234 [(26)] (27) "Voluntary leave", an off-premise leave
235 initiated by:
236 (a) A resident that has not been declared mentally
237 incompetent or incapacitated by a court; or
238 (b) A legal guardian of a resident that has been
239 declared mentally incompetent or incapacitated by a court.
198.070. 1. When any advanced emergency medical
technician; adult day care worker; bank personnel;
chiropractor; Christian Science practitioner; coroner;
dentist; embalmer; emergency medical technician; employee of
the departments of social services, mental health, or health
and senior services; employee of a local area agency on
aging or an organized area agency on aging program;
firefighter; first responder, as defined in section
192.2405; funeral director; home health agency or home
health agency employee; hospital and clinic personnel
engaged in examination, care, or treatment of persons; in-
home services owner, provider, operator, or employee; law
enforcement officer; long-term care facility administrator
or employee; medical examiner; medical resident or intern;
mental health professional; minister; nurse; nurse
practitioner; optometrist; other health practitioner;
paramedic; peace officer; pharmacist; physical therapist;
physician; physician's assistant; podiatrist; probation or
parole officer; psychologist; social worker; or other person
with the care of a person sixty years of age or older or an

SB 1482 41
eligible adult, as defined in section 192.2400, has
reasonable cause to believe that a resident of a facility
has been abused or neglected, he or she shall immediately
report or cause a report to be made to the department.
2. (1) The report shall contain the name and address
of the facility, the name of the resident, information
regarding the nature of the abuse or neglect, the name of
the complainant, and any other information which might be
helpful in an investigation.
(2) In the event of suspected sexual assault of the
resident, in addition to the report to be made to the
department, a report shall be made to the appropriate local
law enforcement agency in accordance with federal law under
the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section 1320b-25.
3. Any person required in subsection 1 of this section
to report or cause a report to be made to the department who
knowingly fails to make a report within a reasonable time
after the act of abuse or neglect as required in this
subsection is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
4. In addition to the penalties imposed by this
section, any administrator who knowingly conceals any act of
abuse or neglect resulting in death or serious physical
injury, as defined in section 556.061, is guilty of a class
E felony.
5. In addition to those persons required to report
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, any other person
having reasonable cause to believe that a resident has been
abused or neglected may report such information to the
department.
6. Upon receipt of a report, the department shall
initiate an investigation within twenty-four hours and, as
soon as possible during the course of the investigation,

SB 1482 42
shall notify the resident's next of kin or responsible party
of the report and the investigation and further notify them
whether the report was substantiated or unsubstantiated
unless such person is the alleged perpetrator of the abuse
or neglect. As provided in section 192.2425, substantiated
reports of elder abuse shall be promptly reported by the
department to the appropriate law enforcement agency and
prosecutor.
7. If the investigation indicates possible abuse or
neglect of a resident, the investigator shall refer the
complaint together with the investigator's report to the
department director or the director's designee for
appropriate action. If, during the investigation or at its
completion, the department has reasonable cause to believe
that immediate removal is necessary to protect the resident
from abuse or neglect, the department or the local
prosecuting attorney may, or the attorney general upon
request of the department shall, file a petition for
temporary care and protection of the resident in a circuit
court of competent jurisdiction. The circuit court in which
the petition is filed shall have equitable jurisdiction to
issue an ex parte order granting the department authority
for the temporary care and protection of the resident, for a
period not to exceed thirty days.
8. Reports, including investigation records, shall be
confidential, as provided pursuant to section 192.2500.
9. Anyone, except any person who has abused or
neglected a resident in a facility, who makes a report
pursuant to this section or who testifies in any
administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the
report shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability
for making such a report or for testifying except for

SB 1482 43
liability for perjury, unless such person acted negligently,
recklessly, in bad faith or with malicious purpose. It is a
crime under section 565.189 for any person to knowingly file
a false report of elder abuse or neglect.
10. Within five working days after a report required
to be made pursuant to this section is received, the person
making the report shall be notified in writing of its
receipt and of the initiation of the investigation.
11. No person who directs or exercises any authority
in a facility shall evict, harass, dismiss or retaliate
against a resident or employee because such resident or
employee or any member of such resident's or employee's
family has made a report of any violation or suspected
violation of laws, ordinances or regulations applying to the
facility which the resident, the resident's family or an
100 employee has reasonable cause to believe has been committed
101 or has occurred. Through the existing department
102 information and referral telephone contact line, residents,
103 their families and employees of a facility shall be able to
104 obtain information about their rights, protections and
105 options in cases of eviction, harassment, dismissal or
106 retaliation due to a report being made pursuant to this
107 section.
108 12. Any person who abuses or neglects a resident of a
109 facility is subject to criminal prosecution under section
110 565.184.
111 13. The department shall maintain the employee
112 disqualification list and place on the employee
113 disqualification list the names of any persons who are or
114 have been employed in any facility and who have been finally
115 determined by the department pursuant to section 192.2490 to
116 have knowingly or recklessly abused or neglected a

SB 1482 44
117 resident. For purposes of this section only, "knowingly"
118 and "recklessly" shall have the meanings that are ascribed
119 to them in this section. A person acts "knowingly" with
120 respect to the person's conduct when a reasonable person
121 should be aware of the result caused by his or her conduct.
122 A person acts "recklessly" when the person consciously
123 disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the
124 person's conduct will result in serious physical injury and
125 such disregard constitutes a gross deviation from the
126 standard of care that a reasonable person would exercise in
127 the situation.
128 14. The timely self-reporting of incidents to the
129 central registry by a facility shall continue to be
130 investigated in accordance with department policy, and shall
131 not be counted or reported by the department as a hot-line
132 call but rather a self-reported incident. If the self-
133 reported incident results in a regulatory violation, such
134 incident shall be reported as a substantiated report.
208.912. 1. When any advanced emergency medical
technician; adult day care worker; bank personnel;
chiropractor[,]; Christian Science practitioner[,];
coroner[,]; dentist[,]; embalmer[,]; emergency medical
technician; employee of the departments of social services,
mental health, or health and senior services; employee of a
local area agency on aging or an organized area agency on
aging program; firefighter; first responder, as defined in
section 192.2405; funeral director; home health agency or
home health agency employee; hospital and clinic personnel
engaged in examination, care, or treatment of persons; in-
home services owner, provider, operator, or employee; law
enforcement officer; long-term care facility administrator
or employee; medical examiner; medical resident or intern;

SB 1482 45
mental health professional; minister; nurse; nurse
practitioner; optometrist; other health practitioner;
paramedic; peace officer; pharmacist; physical therapist;
physician; physician's assistant; podiatrist; probation or
parole officer; psychologist; vendor as defined in section
208.900; personal care attendant; or social worker has
reasonable cause to believe that a consumer has been abused
or neglected as defined in section 192.2400 as a result of
the delivery of or failure to deliver personal care
assistance services, he or she shall immediately report or
cause a report to be made to the department. If the report
is made by a physician of the consumer, the department shall
maintain contact with the physician regarding the progress
of the investigation.
2. When a report of deteriorating physical condition
resulting in possible abuse or neglect of a consumer is
received by the department, the department's case manager
and the department nurse shall be notified. The case
manager shall investigate and immediately report the results
of the investigation to the department nurse.
3. If requested, local area agencies on aging shall
provide volunteer training to those persons listed in
subsection 1 of this section regarding the detection and
reporting of abuse and neglect under this section.
4. Any person required in subsection 1 of this section
to report or cause a report to be made to the department who
fails to do so within a reasonable time after the act of
abuse or neglect is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
5. The report shall contain the names and addresses of
the vendor, the personal care attendant, and the consumer,
and information regarding the nature of the abuse or

SB 1482 46
neglect, the name of the complainant, and any other
information which might be helpful in an investigation.
6. In addition to those persons required to report
under subsection 1 of this section, any other person having
reasonable cause to believe that a consumer has been abused
or neglected by a personal care attendant may report such
information to the department.
7. If the investigation indicates possible abuse or
neglect of a consumer, the investigator shall refer the
complaint together with his or her report to the department
director or his or her designee for appropriate action. If,
during the investigation or at its completion, the
department has reasonable cause to believe that immediate
action is necessary to protect the consumer from abuse or
neglect, the department or the local prosecuting attorney
may, or the attorney general upon request of the department
shall, file a petition for temporary care and protection of
the consumer in a circuit court of competent jurisdiction.
The circuit court in which the petition is filed shall have
equitable jurisdiction to issue an ex parte order granting
the department authority for the temporary care and
protection of the consumer, for a period not to exceed
thirty days.
8. Reports, including investigation reports, shall be
confidential, as provided under section 192.2500.
9. Anyone, except any person who has abused or
neglected a consumer, who makes a report pursuant to this
section or who testifies in any administrative or judicial
proceeding arising from the report shall be immune from any
civil or criminal liability for making such a report or for
testifying, except for liability for perjury, unless such

SB 1482 47
person acted negligently, recklessly, in bad faith, or with
malicious purpose.
10. Within five working days after a report required
to be made under this section is received, the person making
the report shall be notified of its receipt and of the
initiation of the investigation.
11. No person who directs or exercises any authority
as a vendor, and no personal care attendant, shall harass,
dismiss or retaliate against a consumer because he or she or
any member of his or her family has made a report of any
violation or suspected violation of laws, standards or
regulations applying to the vendor or personal care
attendant which he or she has reasonable cause to believe
has been committed or has occurred.
12. The department shall place on the employee
disqualification list established in section 192.2490 the
names of any persons who have been finally determined by the
department to have recklessly, knowingly or purposely abused
or neglected a consumer while employed by a vendor, or
employed by a consumer as a personal care attendant.
13. The department shall provide the list maintained
pursuant to section 192.2490 to vendors as defined in
section 208.900.
100 14. Any person, corporation or association who
101 received the employee disqualification list under subsection
102 13 of this section, or any person responsible for providing
103 health care service, who declines to employ or terminates a
104 person whose name is listed in this section shall be immune
105 from suit by that person or anyone else acting for or in
106 behalf of that person for the failure to employ or for the

SB 1482 48
107 termination of the person whose name is listed on the
108 employee disqualification list.
✓